Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 6. REGULATION OF ENGINEERING, ARCHITECTURE, LAND SURVEYING, AND RELATED PRACTICES

SUBTITLE C. REGULATION OF LAND SURVEYING AND RELATED PRACTICES

CHAPTER 1071. LAND SURVEYORS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 1071.001. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited as the Professional Land Surveying Practices Act.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1071.002. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the Texas Board of Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors.

(2) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the General Land Office.

(3) "Delegated responsible charge" means the direct control of professional surveying work performed under the supervision of a registered professional land surveyor.

(4) "Land surveyor" means a registered professional land surveyor or licensed state land surveyor.

(5) "Licensed state land surveyor" means a surveyor licensed by the board to survey land in which the state or the permanent school fund has an interest or perform other original surveys for the purpose of filing field notes in the General Land Office.

(6) "Professional surveying" means the practice of land, boundary, or property surveying or other similar professional practices. The term includes:

(A) performing any service or work the adequate performance of which involves applying special knowledge of the principles of geodesy, mathematics, related applied and physical sciences, and relevant laws to the measurement or location of sites, points, lines, angles, elevations, natural features, and existing man-made works in the air, on the earth's surface, within underground workings, and on the beds of bodies of water to determine areas and volumes for:

(i) locating real property boundaries;

(ii) platting and laying out land and subdivisions of land; or

(iii) preparing and perpetuating maps, record plats, field note records, easements, and real property descriptions that represent those surveys; and

(B) consulting, investigating, evaluating, analyzing, planning, providing an expert surveying opinion or testimony, acquiring survey data, preparing technical reports, and mapping to the extent those acts are performed in connection with acts described by this subdivision.

(7) "Registered professional land surveyor" means a person registered by the board as a registered professional land surveyor.

(8) "State land surveying" means the science or practice of land measurement according to established and recognized methods engaged in as a profession or service for the public for compensation and consisting of the following activities conducted when the resulting field notes or maps are to be filed with the General Land Office:

(A) determining by survey the location or relocation of original land grant boundaries and corners;

(B) calculating area and preparing field note descriptions of surveyed and unsurveyed land or land in which the state or the permanent school fund has an interest; and

(C) preparing maps showing the survey results.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 611 (H.B. 2179), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (H.B. 1523), Sec. 1.51, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1071.004. APPLICATION OF CHAPTER. This chapter does not require the use of a registered professional land surveyor to establish an easement or a construction estimate that does not involve the monumentation, delineation, or preparation of a metes and bounds description.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER F. REGISTRATION, LICENSING, AND CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS

Sec. 1071.251. REGISTRATION, LICENSE, OR CERTIFICATE REQUIRED. (a) In this section, "offer to practice" means to represent by verbal claim, sign, letterhead, card, or other method that a person is registered or licensed to perform professional surveying in this state.

(b) A person may not engage in the practice of professional surveying unless the person is registered, licensed, or certified as provided by this chapter.

(c) A person may not offer to practice professional surveying in this state unless the person is registered or licensed as provided by this chapter.

(d) A person may not use in connection with the person's name or use or advertise a title or description that tends to convey the impression that the person is a professional land surveyor unless the person is registered or licensed under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1071.252. APPLICATION REQUIREMENTS. (a) An applicant for certification as a surveyor-in-training, registration as a registered professional land surveyor, or licensing as a licensed state land surveyor must file a written application with the board accompanied by an application fee in an amount determined by the board.

(b) An application must be made on a form prescribed and furnished by the board and contain statements that show the applicant's education and experience. The application must contain a detailed summary of the applicant's education and experience and references from at least three registered professional land surveyors having personal knowledge of the applicant's surveying experience. The board shall accept an application that meets board requirements regardless of whether the application is notarized.

(c) After the board determines that the applicant is qualified to take the appropriate section of the examination under Section 1071.256, the board shall set the examination section the applicant is approved to take and notify the applicant of the examination section and of the time and place of the examination. The applicant may take the examination section on payment of an examination fee in an amount determined by the board.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1071.253. SURVEYOR-IN-TRAINING CERTIFICATE. (a) An applicant for a surveyor-in-training certificate must:

(1) have earned a bachelor of science degree in surveying from an accredited institution of higher education;

(2) have:

(A) earned a bachelor's degree from an accredited institution of higher education that included at least 32 semester hours in a combination of courses acceptable to the board in:

(i) civil engineering;

(ii) land surveying;

(iii) mathematics;

(iv) photogrammetry;

(v) forestry;

(vi) land law; or

(vii) the physical sciences; and

(B) completed at least one year of experience acceptable to the board in delegated responsible charge as a subordinate to a registered professional land surveyor actively engaged in professional surveying;

(3) have:

(A) earned an associate degree in surveying from an accredited institution of higher education; and

(B) completed at least two years of experience acceptable to the board in delegated responsible charge as a subordinate to a registered professional land surveyor actively engaged in professional surveying;

(4) have:

(A) successfully completed a course of instruction consisting of 32 semester hours in land surveying or the equivalent number of semester hours in board-approved courses related to surveying; and

(B) completed at least two years of experience acceptable to the board in delegated responsible charge as a subordinate to a registered professional land surveyor actively engaged in professional surveying; or

(5) have:

(A) graduated from an accredited high school;

(B) completed at least four years of experience acceptable to the board in delegated responsible charge as a subordinate to a registered professional land surveyor actively engaged in professional surveying; and

(C) provided evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant is self-educated in professional surveying.

(b) On proof that an applicant has the qualifications required by Subsection (a), the board shall allow the applicant to take an examination consisting of parts of the examination under Section 1071.256, the contents of which are as determined or approved by the board.

(c) The board shall issue a surveyor-in-training certificate to an applicant who passes the applicable parts of the examination taken under Subsection (b). The certificate is valid for eight years.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 53 (S.B. 1340), Sec. 1, eff. May 10, 2007.

Sec. 1071.254. QUALIFICATIONS FOR REGISTRATION AS REGISTERED PROFESSIONAL LAND SURVEYOR. (a) An applicant for registration as a registered professional land surveyor must:

(1) hold a certificate as a surveyor-in-training;

(2) have at least two years of experience satisfactory to the board as a surveyor-in-training in performing surveying in delegated responsible charge as a subordinate to a surveyor registered or licensed to engage in the practice of surveying in this state or in another state having registration or licensing requirements equivalent to the requirements of this state; and

(3) have earned an associate or bachelor's degree from an accredited institution of higher education that included at least 32 semester hours in a combination of courses acceptable to the board in:

(A) civil engineering;

(B) land surveying;

(C) mathematics;

(D) photogrammetry;

(E) forestry;

(F) land law; or

(G) the physical sciences.

(b) An applicant is entitled to registration as a registered professional land surveyor if the applicant meets the qualifications prescribed by Subsection (a) and is approved to take and passes the required sections of the examination prescribed under Section 1071.256.

(c) The board by rule may authorize the waiver of the requirement that an applicant for registration as a registered professional land surveyor have a bachelor's degree if the board determines:

(1) the applicant possesses sufficient qualifications to justify the waiver; and

(2) the applicant's registration does not pose a threat to the public health, safety, or welfare.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (H.B. 1523), Sec. 1.52, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1071.255. QUALIFICATIONS FOR LICENSING AS LICENSED STATE LAND SURVEYOR; OATH. (a) A registered professional land surveyor is entitled to be licensed as a licensed state land surveyor if the person is approved to take and passes the appropriate sections of the examination prescribed under Section 1071.256.

(b) The board may not issue a license to a licensed state land surveyor until the applicant takes the official oath stating that the person will faithfully, impartially, and honestly perform all the duties of a licensed state land surveyor to the best of the person's skill and ability in all matters in which the person may be employed.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (H.B. 1523), Sec. 1.58(6), eff. September 1, 2019.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (H.B. 1523), Sec. 1.58(6), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1071.256. EXAMINATION. (a) The board shall prescribe the scope of the written examination and examination procedures with special reference to the applicant's ability in order to protect the public safety, welfare, and property rights.

(b) The examination for an applicant for registration as a registered professional land surveyor must be developed and given as provided by this chapter under board rules designed to determine the knowledge and ability of the applicant.

(c) The examination for an applicant for licensing as a licensed state land surveyor must be developed under board rules and include examination on:

(1) the theory of surveying;

(2) the law of land boundaries;

(3) the history and functions of the General Land Office; and

(4) other matters pertaining to surveying as determined by the board.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1071.259. REGISTRATION OF OUT-OF-STATE SURVEYORS. (a) The board may waive any registration requirement for an applicant who holds a license from another state having registration or licensing requirements substantially equivalent to the registration requirements of this state.

(b) The board may issue a certificate of registration as a registered professional land surveyor to an applicant under this section who meets all waived and unwaived registration requirements and who:

(1) applies to the board for a certificate of registration;

(2) pays a fee set by the board; and

(3) passes an examination on Texas surveying.

(c) The board shall determine the contents of the examination under Subsection (b)(3). The examination may not exceed four hours in duration.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1071.260. REGISTRATION NUMBER; FORM OF CERTIFICATE OR LICENSE. (a) The board shall issue to each registered professional land surveyor a registration number that may not be assigned to or used by any other surveyor. The number must be on the certificate of registration and recorded in the board's permanent records and is the surveyor's registration number for use on all official documents.

(b) Each certificate of registration and license issued by the board must show the full name of the registration holder or license holder and shall be signed by the presiding officer and the executive director of the board.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1071.261. DISPLAY OF CERTIFICATE AND LICENSE. (a) An original or renewal certificate of registration or license is evidence that the person whose name and registration number appear on the document is qualified to practice as a registered professional land surveyor or licensed state land surveyor.

(b) A person holding a certificate of registration or license shall display the certificate or license at the person's place of business or practice. The person shall be prepared to substantiate that the certificate or license has been renewed for the current year.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1071.262. REPLACEMENT OF REVOKED, LOST, OR DESTROYED CERTIFICATE OR LICENSE. The board may issue, on payment of a fee set by the board and subject to board rules, a new certificate of registration or license to replace a certificate or license that has been revoked, lost, destroyed, or mutilated.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER G. RENEWAL OF REGISTRATION AND LICENSE

Sec. 1071.301. LICENSE TERM AND RENEWAL. (a) The board by rule shall provide:

(1) that each certificate of registration or license under this chapter is valid for a term of one year or two years; and

(2) for the renewal of the certificate or license.

(a-1) The board by rule may adopt a system under which certificates of registration and licenses expire on various dates during the year.

(a-2) For the year in which the certificate or license expiration date is changed, the board shall prorate certificate and license fees on a monthly basis so that each certificate or license holder pays only that portion of the certificate or license fee that is allocable to the number of months during which the certificate or license is valid. On renewal of the certificate or license on the new expiration date, the total certificate or license renewal fee is payable.

(b) A renewal certificate must have the same registration number as the original certificate.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (H.B. 1523), Sec. 1.53, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (H.B. 1523), Sec. 1.54, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1071.304. NOTICE OF FAILURE TO RENEW STATE LAND SURVEYOR LICENSE. The executive director shall immediately notify the commissioner when the license of a licensed state land surveyor expires due to the person's failure to timely renew the license.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1071.305. CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL EDUCATION. (a) As a condition for renewal of a certificate of registration, the board shall require a registered professional land surveyor to successfully complete continuing professional education courses as prescribed by board rule. The board's rules must provide that the continuing professional education requirement may be met by completing annually not more than 16 hours of professional development courses or programs.

(b) The board may also grant professional education credit for:

(1) satisfactory completion of academic work at an accredited institution;

(2) teaching or consulting in a program approved by the board; or

(3) authorship of a technical paper approved by the board.

(c) A registered professional land surveyor shall maintain records relating to the person's professional education activities. The records are subject to audit by the board on application by the person for renewal of registration.

(d) As a condition for retaining a surveyor-in-training certificate, the board shall require the certificate holder to successfully complete continuing professional education courses as prescribed by board rule. The certificate holder shall maintain records relating to the person's professional education activities. The records are subject to audit by the board as a condition for retaining the certificate.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 53 (S.B. 1340), Sec. 2, eff. May 10, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1161 (H.B. 3114), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER H. PRACTICE OF LAND SURVEYING

Sec. 1071.351. PERFORMANCE OF LAND SURVEYING; OFFICIAL SEAL. (a) In this section, "employee" means a person who receives compensation for work performed under the direct supervision of a land surveyor.

(b) On receipt of a certificate of registration, a registered professional land surveyor shall obtain an authorized seal bearing the person's name and registration number and the title "Registered Professional Land Surveyor."

(c) Each licensed state land surveyor shall obtain a seal of office. The seal must contain the license holder's official title, "Licensed State Land Surveyor," around the margin and the word "Texas" between the points of the star in the seal. A licensed state land surveyor shall attest with the seal all official acts authorized under law. An act, paper, or map of a licensed state land surveyor may not be filed in the county records of the General Land Office unless it is certified to under the surveyor's seal.

(d) A registration holder or license holder may not affix the person's name, seal, or certification to any plat, design, specification, or other professional surveying work that is prepared by a person who is not registered or licensed under this chapter unless the work is performed by an employee under the direct supervision of the registration holder or license holder.

(e) A registration holder or license holder may not allow a person who is not registered or licensed under this chapter to exert control over the end product of professional surveying work.

(f) If professional surveying is performed as a joint venture of an association of two or more firms, each firm shall use the seal of the surveyor having primary responsibility for the venture.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1071.352. SURVEYING BY BUSINESS ENTITY. (a) An association, partnership, or corporation may not offer professional surveying services unless the entity is registered with the board and a registered professional land surveyor is employed full-time where the services are offered.

(a-1) The board shall adopt rules prescribing the requirements for the registration of an entity described by Subsection (a).

(a-2) The board may refuse to issue or renew and may suspend or revoke the registration of a business entity and may impose an administrative penalty under Subchapter K, Chapter 1001, against the owner of a business entity for a violation of this chapter by an employee, agent, or other representative of the entity, including a registered professional land surveyor employed by the entity.

(b) A registered professional land surveyor or licensed state land surveyor may organize or engage in any form of individual or group practice of surveying allowed by state statute. The individual or group practice must properly identify the registered professional land surveyor or licensed state land surveyor who is responsible for the practice.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1077 (H.B. 2820), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (H.B. 1523), Sec. 1.55, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1071.353. PRACTICE UNDER ASSUMED NAME. A person engaging in the practice of surveying in this state under any business title other than the real name of one or more persons authorized to engage in public or state land surveying, whether individually or as an association, partnership, or corporation, shall file with the board, in the manner prescribed by the board, a certificate stating the full name and place of residence of each person engaging in the practice and the place, including the street address, city, and zip code, where the practice or business is principally conducted.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1071.354. JURISDICTION OF LICENSED STATE LAND SURVEYORS. A licensed state land surveyor may perform surveys under Section 21.011, Natural Resources Code, and is subject to the commissioner's direction in matters of land surveying in cases that come under the supervision of the commissioner. The jurisdiction of the license holder is coextensive with the limits of the state.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1071.355. LICENSED STATE LAND SURVEYOR AS AGENT OF STATE. A licensed state land surveyor is an agent of this state when acting in that official capacity.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1071.356. RESIGNATION OF LICENSED STATE LAND SURVEYOR. (a) A licensed state land surveyor may resign at any time by filing a written resignation with the board. On receipt of the resignation, the board shall inform the General Land Office.

(b) A licensed state land surveyor who resigns under this section is not entitled to reinstatement of the person's license. To obtain a new license, the person must meet the requirements for an original license.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1071.357. COUNTY SURVEYORS. (a) A licensed state land surveyor may hold office as a county surveyor. If elected, the person must qualify as provided by law for county surveyors.

(b) The election of a licensed state land surveyor as county surveyor does not limit the jurisdiction of the license holder to that county, and the election of a county surveyor for any particular county does not prevent any licensed state land surveyor from performing the duties of a surveyor in that county.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1071.358. COURT ORDER FOR LICENSED STATE LAND SURVEYOR TO CROSS LAND. (a) A licensed state land surveyor engaged in surveying in the person's official capacity who is denied permission to cross land owned by a private party is entitled to a court order to enforce the license holder's authority to cross the land.

(b) The attorney general shall promptly apply for an order under this section from the district court. Venue for the action is in the county in which the land is located.

(c) The court shall grant the order on proof that the person is licensed under this chapter and acting in the person's official capacity.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 158 (S.B. 1634), Sec. 1, eff. May 21, 2007.

Sec. 1071.3585. COURT ORDER FOR REGISTERED PROFESSIONAL LAND SURVEYOR TO CROSS LAND. (a) A registered professional land surveyor engaged in surveying who is denied permission to cross land owned by a person or entity may seek a court order authorizing the surveyor to cross the land.

(b) A registered professional land surveyor may apply for an order under this section from the district court. Venue for the action is in the county in which the land is located.

(c) If the registered professional land surveyor holds office as a county surveyor and is engaged in surveying in the person's official capacity, the county attorney may apply for an order under this section.

(d) The court shall grant the order on proof that:

(1) the person is a registered professional land surveyor acting in the person's official capacity as a county surveyor; or

(2) the person is a registered professional land surveyor and the issuance of a court order authorizing the person to cross the land is in the public's best interest.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 158 (S.B. 1634), Sec. 2, eff. May 21, 2007.

Sec. 1071.359. LICENSED STATE LAND SURVEYOR FIELD NOTES. (a) Official field notes made by a licensed state land surveyor must be signed by the surveyor, followed by the designation "Licensed State Land Surveyor."

(b) Field notes and plats prepared by a licensed state land surveyor must conform to Sections 21.041 and 21.042, Natural Resources Code.

(c) Field notes made by a licensed state land surveyor in any county in this state are admissible in evidence.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1071.360. DISCOVERY OF UNDISCLOSED LAND. A licensed state land surveyor who discovers an undisclosed tract of public land shall:

(1) make that fact known to any person who has the tract enclosed; and

(2) forward a report of the existence of the tract and the tract's acreage to the commissioner.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1071.361. ACCESS TO COUNTY SURVEYOR RECORDS. (a) A licensed state land surveyor is entitled to access to a county surveyor's records for information and examination.

(b) An examination fee may not be charged if the investigation of the records is for the purpose of:

(1) making a survey of public land under the law regulating the sale or lease of public land; or

(2) identifying and establishing the boundaries of public land.

(c) A licensed state land surveyor who examines records under this section shall comply with any regulations prescribed by the county surveyor or the commissioners court for protecting and preserving the records.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER I. DISCIPLINARY PROCEDURES

Sec. 1071.401. DISCIPLINARY POWERS OF BOARD. (a) The board shall revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew a certificate of registration or license, place on probation a person whose certificate or license has been suspended, or reprimand a registration holder or license holder for:

(1) fraud or deceit in obtaining a certificate or license under this chapter;

(2) gross negligence, incompetence, or misconduct in the practice of surveying as a land surveyor; or

(3) a violation of this chapter or a board rule adopted under this chapter.

(b) The license of a licensed state land surveyor is subject to revocation if the license holder is found to be directly or indirectly interested in the purchase or acquisition of title to public land.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 24, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (H.B. 1523), Sec. 1.56, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1071.402. DISCIPLINARY PROCEEDINGS. (a) The board may institute proceedings against a registration holder or license holder on the board's behalf without a formal written third-party complaint.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (H.B. 1523), Sec. 1.58(12), eff. September 1, 2019.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (H.B. 1523), Sec. 1.58(12), eff. September 1, 2019.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (H.B. 1523), Sec. 1.58(12), eff. September 1, 2019.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (H.B. 1523), Sec. 1.58(12), eff. September 1, 2019.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (H.B. 1523), Sec. 1.58(12), eff. September 1, 2019.

(g) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (H.B. 1523), Sec. 1.58(12), eff. September 1, 2019.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (H.B. 1523), Sec. 1.58(12), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1071.403. RIGHT TO HEARING; ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE. (a) If the board proposes to suspend or revoke a person's certificate of registration or license, the person is entitled to a hearing before the board or a hearings officer appointed by the board.

(b) The board shall prescribe procedures by which a decision to suspend or revoke a certificate of registration or license is made by or appealable to the board.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1071.4035. INFORMAL SETTLEMENT CONFERENCE; RESTITUTION. (a) The board by rule shall establish guidelines for an informal settlement conference related to a complaint filed with the board regarding conduct regulated under this chapter.

(b) Subject to Subsection (c), the board may order a person licensed or registered under this chapter to pay restitution to a consumer as provided in an agreement resulting from an informal settlement conference instead of or in addition to assessing an administrative penalty under Subchapter K, Chapter 1001.

(c) The amount of restitution ordered as provided in an agreement resulting from an informal settlement conference may not exceed the amount the consumer paid to the person for a service regulated by this chapter. The board may not require payment of other damages or estimate harm in a restitution order.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (H.B. 1523), Sec. 1.57, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1071.404. PROBATION. (a) The board may require a person whose certificate of registration or license suspension is probated to:

(1) report regularly to the board on matters that are the basis of the probation;

(2) limit practice to the areas prescribed by the board; or

(3) continue or renew professional education until the practitioner attains a degree of skill satisfactory to the board in those areas that are the basis of the probation.

(b) The board by rule shall adopt written guidelines to ensure that probation is administered consistently.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1071.405. REISSUANCE OF CERTIFICATE OR LICENSE. The board for reasons the board determines sufficient may reissue a certificate of registration or license to a surveyor whose certificate or license has been revoked. At least six board members must vote in favor of reissuing the certificate or license.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER K. OTHER PENALTIES AND ENFORCEMENT PROVISIONS

Sec. 1071.503. CIVIL PENALTY. (a) A person who violates this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $1,500 for each violation.

(b) At the request of the board, the attorney general shall bring an action to recover the civil penalty in the name of the state.

(c) A civil penalty recovered under this section shall be deposited in the state treasury.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.

Sec. 1071.504. CRIMINAL PENALTY. (a) In this section, "offer to practice" has the meaning assigned by Section 1071.251.

(b) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) engages in the practice of or offers to practice professional surveying or state land surveying in this state without being registered or licensed in accordance with this chapter;

(2) presents or attempts to use another person's certificate of registration, license, or seal issued under this chapter;

(3) gives false or forged evidence to obtain or assist another person in obtaining a certificate of registration or license; or

(4) violates this chapter or a rule adopted by the board.

(c) An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1421, Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2003.